Utah statutes.
78B-2-310.   Actions against public officers -- Within six years.

An action by the state, any agency, or public corporation against any public officer for malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office or against any surety upon his official bond may be brought within six years after the officer ceases to hold his office.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

